Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 3. Adult Entertainment Business.

Sec. 11.66.300.
Prohibiting minors from being present at an adult entertainment business.

The owner or an agent or employee of the owner of a business that offers adult entertainment may not with criminal negligence allow a person under the age of 18 years to enter and remain within premises where adult entertainment is offered.

In this section, “business that offers adult entertainment” has the meaning given in AS

23.10.350(f)

.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. Each violation is a separate offense.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was formerly subsection (c), and subsection (c) was formerly subsection (b); relettered in 2002.

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.